Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7426.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Sections 5-34.2-2 and 5-34.2-5 of the General Laws in Chapter 5-34.2 entitled
"Nurse Anesthetists" are hereby amended to read as follows:
5-34.2-2. Definitions.
(a)(1) “Board” means the board of nurse registration and nurse education established in §
5-34-4.
(b)(2) “Certified registered nurse anesthetist” (CRNA) means a registered nurse who has
successfully met the requirements stated in this chapter.
(c)(3) “Practice of certified registered nurse anesthesia” means providing certain healthcare
services in collaboration with anesthesiologists, licensed physicians, or licensed dentists in
accordance with § 5-31.1-1(17) which requires substantial specialized knowledge, judgment, and
skill related to the administration of anesthesia, including preoperative and postoperative
assessment of patients; administering anesthetics; monitoring patients during anesthesia;
management of fluid in intravenous therapy; and management of respiratory care. It also includes,
in connection with the immediate perioperative care of a patient, the ability to issue a medication
order for drugs or medications to be administered by a licensed, certified, or registered healthcare
provider; to order and evaluate laboratory and diagnostic test results and perform point-of-care
testing that the CRNA is qualified to perform; and order and evaluate radiographic imaging studies
that the CRNA is qualified to order and interpret. For the purposes of this section, the immediate
perioperative care of a patient shall be defined as the period commencing on the day prior to surgery

and ending upon discharge of the patient from post-anesthesia care. CRNAs shall comply with the
requirements set forth in this chapter, including § 5-34.2-5(b) regarding scope of practice and
prescriptive authority, and the requirements set forth in chapter 34 of this title, as applicable. In the
case of any conflict between this chapter and chapter 34 of this title with regard to the licensure
and practice of CRNAs, this chapter shall control.
(4) “Non-supervised certified registered nurse anesthetist” or “non-supervised CRNA”
means a CRNA with not less than two (2) years’ supervised practice following certification from
the National Board of Certification and Recertification for Nurse Anesthetists and issuance of initial
licensure by the board pursuant to § 5-34-45.
(5) “Supervised certified registered nurse anesthetist” or “supervised CRNA” means a
CRNA with less than two (2) years’ supervised practice following certification from the National
Board of Certification and Recertification for Nurse Anesthetists and issuance of initial licensure
by the board pursuant to § 5-34-45.
5-34.2-5. Accountability — Scope of practice. Accountability -- Scope of practice --
prescriptive authority -- rulemaking authority.
(a) Accountability. The certified registered nurse anesthetist (“CRNA”) shall be
responsible and accountable to the consumer for his or her the CRNA's practice of nurse anesthesia
as defined under this chapter.
(b) Scope of practice and prescriptive authority.
(1) A non-supervised CRNA shall have independent practice authority to deliver anesthesia
care, including the proper administration of the drugs or medicine necessary to deliver anesthesia
care, and related services across the lifespan in various settings based on the non-supervised
CRNA’s education, training and certification, without physician oversight.
(2) A non-supervised CRNA may issue written prescriptions and medication orders and
order tests and therapeutics pursuant to guidelines mutually developed and agreed upon by the non-
supervised CRNA and the supervising CRNA or supervising physician. A prescription issued by a
non-supervised CRNA shall include the name of the supervising CRNA or the supervising
physician with whom the non-supervised CRNA mutually developed and agreed upon guidelines.
Nothing in this section shall require a non-supervised CRNA to obtain prescriptive authority to
deliver anesthesia care as provided in subsection (b)(1) of this section.
(3) The board may allow a non-supervised CRNA to exercise independent practice
authority as provided in subsection (b)(1) of this section upon satisfactory demonstration of
alternative professional experience if the board determines that the CRNA has a demonstrated
record of safe prescribing and good conduct consistent with professional licensure obligations
LC004092 - Page 2 of 4

required by each jurisdiction in which the CRNA has been licensed.
(4) A supervised CRNA shall practice under the supervision of a healthcare professional
who meets minimum qualification criteria promulgated by the board, which shall include a
minimum number of years of independent practice experience.
(5) A hospital shall not limit the independent practice authority of a non-supervised CRNA.
(c) This chapter and the rules and regulations of the board The governing board of a
licensed hospital or, in the case of a clinic or office a licensed anesthetist, physician, or dentist,
shall determine the scope of practice of the nurse anesthetists CRNAs. All responsibilities shall be
in writing in the form prescribed by hospital or office policy. Additionally, nurse anesthetists
CRNAs shall practice in accordance with the current American Association of Nurse Anesthetists
guidelines for nurse anesthesia practice if the nurse anesthetists those guidelines for nurse
anesthesia practice neither do not violate nor or contradict hospital, clinic, or physician- or dentist-
office bylaws, rules, regulations, and policies, nor this chapter.
(d) The board is authorized and directed to promulgate rules and regulations to implement
this section.
(e) The executive office of health and human services shall apply to the United States
Department of Health and Human Services for any amendment to the state Medicaid plan or for
any Medicaid waiver as necessary to implement this section. The executive office of health and
human services shall submit the Medicaid state plan amendment no later than September 1, 2026.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect on January 1, 2027.
========
LC004092
========
LC004092 - Page 3 of 4